Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-646
Orders or decisions; review.

Any person who feels aggrieved by any order or decision in connection with the granting or denial, in whole or in part, of an application for a permit or in connection with the revocation or modification of a permit may institute proceedings in the Court of Appeals in the manner provided for in section 61-207.

Laws 1963, c. 276, § 9, p. 831;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 109;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 184.